District of Columbia statutes.
32-1365

Oversight.

(a)

The District of Columbia Office of Human Rights (“Office”) shall receive, review, and investigate complaints regarding violations of this chapter and shall take appropriate enforcement action regarding the complaints.

(b)

The Office shall respond to a complaint arising pursuant to this chapter no later than one month after the complaint is filed.

(c)

The Office shall assess civil penalties in all cases where the Office determines that an employer or employment agency has committed a violation of this chapter.

May 31, 2012, D.C. Law 19-132, § 6, 59 DCR 2391